public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aerar/A
dexalvear/A
ansimar/A
arsirar/A
aumentar/A
badajar/A
dexbalar/A
xbalordir/A
kontrabandonar/A
dexbaraŧar/A
basar/A
dexbatiđar/A
inbavarar/A
bekolar/A
bestemar/A
biankiđar/A
arbinar/A
biskar/A
inboɉar/A
bokonar/A
bonaŧar/A
bordir/A
dexbotir/A
xboxemar/A
xbranar/A
xbraŧolar/A
xbriñar/A
inbroketar/A
brunir/A
rebufar/A
inbuxarir/A
scapar/A
censir/A
koncéñer/A
ciɉar/A
conbar/A
daŧiar/A
derenar/A
dexinar/A
dixnar/A
domandar/A
dorar/A
driŧar/A
reprodúxer/A
đogatolar/A
đurar/A
elèđer/A
esir/A
exímer/A
strafar/A
falar/A
desfangar/A
infastidir/A
anplifegar/A
feliŧitar/A
fénxer/A
sferdir/A
sfiadar/A
infiaskar/A
rafigurar/A
definir/A
firmar/A
inafitar/A
sfogar/A
fónder/A
deskonfortar/A
renforŧar/A
franar/A
infrànđer/A
fratonar/A
sfregolar/A
fritolar/A
sfruñar/A
profumar/A
fustegar/A
galantejar/A
galopar/A
dexganŧar/A
dexgardar/A
ingatolar/A
xgiñaŧar/A
xgonbrar/A
gradir/A
granir/A
dexgrankir/A
graŧiar/A
dexgređar/A
griliar/A
ingriŧolir/A
dexgrosar/A
inguɉar/A
guarnir/A
regurxitar/A
idroxenar/A
infestar/A
inpedir/A
interesar/A
inŧitar/A
reiterar/A
dexɉaŧar/A
xɉinŧar/A
ɉustar/A
deskaenaŧar/A
reskaldar/A
inkalmar/A
deskalŧinar/A
akanar/A
inkanevar/A
kanpionar/A
kapir/A
kapitolar/A
inkaratar/A
skarmir/A
deskartar/A
skartoŧar/A
inkastrar/A
inkatifar/A
kauteriđar/A
kavalkar/A
skekeđar/A
skofonar/A
kokonar/A
kolmar/A
koltivar/A
skomunegar/A
konfuxionar/A
konpilar/A
kontaminar/A
konŧar/A
rekopiar/A
traskórer/A
skordar/A
skoroŧar/A
deskostar/A
skovar/A
strakréder/A
inkrikar/A
skrokolar/A
deskroxar/A
skuajar/A
intrakuerar/A
inkuixir/A
kunar/A
prokurar/A
rekúxer/A
xlanguir/A
lapidar/A
inlaŧar/A
ledamar/A
lemoxinar/A
elevar/A
ekuilibrar/A
xlikiñar/A
xliŧegar/A
dexlogar/A
dexlontanar/A
prelúder/A
stralunar/A
tralúxer/A
xmagonar/A
xmaliŧiar/A
xmanarar/A
xmanetar/A
stramañar/A
maraveɉar/A
margotar/A
xmarŧir/A
inmaskarar/A
xmatar/A
inmaŧetar/A
međar/A
mejorar/A
amendar/A
xmenuŧar/A
merkantar/A
malméter/A
traxméter/A
xmilŧir/A
xminuŧar/A
modular/A
xmolar/A
xmojar/A
stramontar/A
morbar/A
xmorfir/A
tramortir/A
xmoŧar/A
mudar/A
mular/A
inmusar/A
inmutir/A
nanarar/A
anaspar/A
denegar/A
nevegar/A
nobilir/A
renonŧiar/A
dexnuar/A
iñarar/A
obedir/A
ojar/A
olsar/A
abondar/A
opiniar/A
orbegar/A
orlar/A
dexosar/A
pacar/A
padriđar/A
despajar/A
despalar/A
palixar/A
panar/A
konpaneđar/A
spapar/A
konparer/A
desparecar/A
despartir/A
pasar/A
trapasar/A
pastrocar/A
patinar/A
paŧientar/A
inpavionar/A
spegaŧar/A
spelar/A
penar/A
propénder/A
penolar/A
inpeñar/A
deperir/A
sperlongar/A
inpestar/A
konpèter/A
espetorar/A
pexar/A
despiantar/A
piàxer/A
spierar/A
pikolir/A
pionar/A
pirar/A
spisakiar/A
spiŧegar/A
aplàuder/A
polakar/A
polsar/A
antepóner/A
frapóner/A
inponarar/A
strapontar/A
spontonar/A
soporar/A
strasportar/A
spostar/A
inpotifar/A
pregar/A
prestar/A
raprexentar/A
profetiđar/A
despropiar/A
puniar/A
espurgar/A
puxar/A
dexradixar/A
xraixar/A
rangar/A
rantegar/A
rasar/A
raxonar/A
reklutar/A
remengar/A
respexolar/A
ríder/A
riscar/A
derivar/A
koròder/A
surogar/A
ronbar/A
ronkolar/A
inrosir/A
rovinar/A
rugar/A
ruñir/A
saer/A
sajar/A
sakramentar/A
salmastrar/A
resaltar/A
insanguenar/A
saraxinar/A
strasaver/A
scanxar/A
secar/A
insekir/A
segregar/A
seguestrar/A
asejar/A
inselvadigir/A
insensar/A
malsentir/A
separar/A
serbar/A
asestar/A
sfisiar/A
konsiderar/A
singolariđar/A
skalinar/A
skarselar/A
skitar/A
skotar/A
iskurir/A
insolentar/A
sonetar/A
resòrxer/A
spaŧiar/A
respetar/A
spirar/A
insporkar/A
stabilir/A
stankeđar/A
predestenar/A
kostituir/A
storpiar/A
strénđer/A
ostruir/A
destudar/A
sufitar/A
supiar/A
tabular/A
destakar/A
stanfar/A
tarokar/A
intaxar/A
preténder/A
stenprar/A
asteñir/A
retèñer/A
desoterar/A
intestar/A
retirar/A
intolar/A
topar/A
stortar/A
toxar/A
tragar/A
destrasinar/A
retràxer/A
tridolar/A
destronar/A
trusar/A
ŧapolar/A
ŧelebrar/A
deŧernir/A
inŧíder/A
inŧipriar/A
inŧotar/A
urlar/A
vagabondar/A
xvanpir/A
travaxar/A
veɉetar/A
ventar/A
dexveñir/A
intervèñer/A
vergoñar/A
avertir/A
xvestir/A
xvimenar/A
viŧar/A
xvodar/A
voltar/A
vomitar/A
xaudir/A
xelar/A
xgorlar/A
xmeriliar/A
xufolar/A
